Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.092

Salary of judges.

The annual salary of the judges of the superior court shall be established by the Washington citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials.

[ 1986 c 155 s 6; 1984 c 258 s 403.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—Severability—1986 c 155: See notes following RCW 43.03.300.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Salaries of judicial officers: State Constitution Art. 4 s 13, 14; Art. 28 s 1; Art. 30 s 1.

Washington citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials: RCW 43.03.305.